Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 1

Department of Human Services

71-1-101. Short title.

This part may be cited as the “Welfare Organization Law of 1937.”

Acts 1937, ch. 48, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.1 (Williams, § 4765.15); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-101, 14-1-101.

Cross-References. Department of human services responsibilities regarding child sexual abuse, title 37, ch. 1, part 6.

Revocation or denial for child support enforcement, title 36, ch. 5, pt. 7.

Law Reviews.

Family Support and Supporting Families, 68 Vand. L. Rev. En Banc 153 (2015).

Attorney General Opinions. Relationship between social security disability claims and unemployment insurance benefits. OAG 10-106, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 112 (10/27/10).

71-1-102. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of human services;

“Department” means the department of human services;

“Director” means the director of a division within the department;

“Division” means one (1) of the divisions created within the department of human services for the purposes of administration;

“Region” means one (1) or more counties grouped for the purpose of local administration; and

“Regional director” means the director of a region.

Acts 1937, ch. 48, § 14; 1939, ch. 95, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.3 (Williams, § 4765.1); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, §§ 1 (a, b), 2 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-102, 14-1-102.

71-1-103. Department created.

There is created a department of state government, which shall be known and designated as the department of human services.

Acts 1937, ch. 48, § 1; 1939, ch. 95, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.3 (Williams, § 4765.1); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-103, 14-1-103.

Cross-References. Department of human services responsibilities regarding child sexual abuse, title 37, ch. 1, parts 4 and 6.

Establishment of department, §4-3-101.

71-1-104. Succession to previous agencies — Workshop for blind.

The department shall in all respects be the legal successor to the corporate powers, duties, and responsibilities of the commission for the blind, and any other state welfare commissions other than those that may be excepted by § 71-1-105(a)(1). The department shall succeed to all the rights and obligations of these agencies; provided, that the workshops for the blind located at Nashville and Memphis shall, through this department or by contract with a nonprofit organization or organizations, continue to be operated for the employment of blind persons.

Notwithstanding § 12-2-112 or § 12-2-403, the department has the authority, subject to the approval of the state building commission, to convey ownership of the workshops to any such contractor without financial consideration, including real and personal property, inventory of materials, and stores for resale. The instrument of conveyance to such nonprofit contractor shall provide that the real property and production equipment conveyed, or sufficient remuneration for the real property and production equipment, shall revert to the state at any time the contractor or its successor shall cease operating a workshop for the benefit of the blind, unless the state finds in its sole discretion that it is in the state's best interest to allow such real property and production equipment to be sold to such contractor or contractor's successor at such time as the contractor or contractor's successor shall cease operating a workshop for the benefit of the blind. If the state deems it appropriate to convey such real property and production equipment to the contractor, then the amount of remuneration to be paid by the contractor or its successor to the state shall be determined at the time the real property and production equipment is originally conveyed to the contractor, to be based upon the appraised value of the real property and production equipment at the time of the original conveyance to the contractor.

Acts 1937, ch. 48, § 2; 1939, ch. 95, § 3; 1943, ch. 154, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.4 (Williams, §§ 4765.2, 4765.3a); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 14-140; Acts 1982, ch. 863, § 1; 1986, ch. 829, § 1; T.C.A., §14-1-104; Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 56.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 66 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

Cross-References. Administration of workshops for blind, §71-4-203.

71-1-105. Powers and duties.

The department is charged with the administration or supervision of all of the public welfare activities of the state as provided in this section. The department shall:

Administer or supervise all functions of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C.), established or to be established in Tennessee that may be assigned to it by law, regulation or executive order;

Cooperate with the federal government or its agencies or instrumentalities, in establishing, extending, strengthening or reforming services to assist persons and families in need of such services from this state;

Promote the unified development of the institutional and noninstitutional agencies subject to its jurisdiction, including the determination of all matters of general policy and the control of the administration of each of the institutional or noninstitutional agencies in the department, so that each institutional or noninstitutional agency shall perform its function as an integral part of the general system;

Establish and enforce reasonable rules and regulations governing the custody, use and preservation of the records, papers, files and communications of the department. The use of such records, papers, files and communications by any other agency or department of the government to which they may be furnished shall be limited to the purpose for which they are furnished and by the law by which they may be furnished;

License or approve, and supervise, adult day care centers and child care agencies as defined in chapter 2, part 4, and chapter 3, part 5 of this title, and to promulgate any regulations it deems necessary to carry out the licensing laws;

Establish criteria for the approval of persons or entities who receive any state or federal funds for the provision of care for adults or children whether those persons or entities are licensed or approved as provided in chapter 2, part 4 or chapter 3, part 5, of this title, or whether they are otherwise unlicensed, and, if determined by the department to be necessary, provide for such criteria in regulations promulgated pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled at title 4, chapter 5, part 2; and

Utilize any state, federal, local or private funding to provide for any child care or adult day care services or training that it deems necessary to promote the welfare of children and adults or that is required or permitted by state or federal law or regulations, and to provide such services or training directly or by contract with any public or private entities;

Promote and employ the use of such measures as are designed to restore persons receiving assistance or services from the department to a condition of self-support in the community and pursue the preventive aspects of its work, including providing, to the extent possible, foster care for adults who are unable to maintain an independent living arrangement, and such other services to those liable to become destitute or handicapped as will prevent their becoming or remaining public charges;

Study the causes of economic dependency or rehabilitative service requirements for persons in need of economic support or rehabilitative services in Tennessee and promote efficient methods for assisting persons in need of such support or services;

Cooperate with the commissioner of social security, and with any other agency or instrumentality of the federal government in any reasonable manner that may be necessary to qualify for federal aid for assistance to persons who are entitled to assistance under the Social Security Act, except as otherwise provided by subdivision (a)(1), and in conformity with this part, including the making of such reports, in such form and containing such information as the commissioner of social security or any other agency or instrumentality of the federal government may, from time to time, require and comply with such requirements as such commissioner, agency, or instrumentality may, from time to time, find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports;

Receive and expend as provided by law any public and private donations, not provided for by § 71-1-113, and the department may expend a reasonable proportion of any such donation for administrative purposes;

Assist and cooperate with other departments, agencies, instrumentalities, and institutions of the state and federal governments, when so requested, in performing services in conformity with the purposes of this part;

Act in cooperation with the federal government in welfare matters of mutual concern in conformity with this part and in the administration of any federal funds granted to this state or any state appropriations to aid in the furtherance of any such functions of the state government, including relief and assistance of needy citizens;

Make such rules and regulations and take such action as may be deemed necessary or desirable to carry out this part and that are not inconsistent with this part;

Administer such additional public welfare functions as are hereby or may be vested in it by law pursuant to this part;

Be authorized to license blind persons to operate vending stands in state and county buildings; provided, that, in the opinion of the director of vocational rehabilitation and the custodian of such building or buildings, a suitable place may be found for the location of such stand or stands to be operated in accordance with the Randolph-Sheppard Vending Stand Act of June 20, 1936, chapter 638, 49 Stat. 1559 (20 U.S.C. § 107 et seq.), or amendments to that act;

Enforce the provisions of Title IV-D of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.), relative to child and spousal support and establishment of paternity and to contract with public or private entities to provide any services necessary to carry out such provisions;

Conduct investigations, which shall include, but not be limited to, investigation into the existence of:

Trafficking in, or fraud involving, the food assistance program administered by the department pursuant to chapter 5, part 3 of this title;

Fraud, abuse, theft, misappropriation, or misuse of property, funds, or services by any person or entity in any program administered by the department; and

Misconduct by any employee, contractor, or agent of the department concerning or related to the operation of any department program or any laws, regulations or policies governing the department's operations; and

When conducting any investigation pursuant to subdivision (a)(16)(A) or (a)(16)(B):

Have the power to issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses, the examination of witnesses under oath, and the production of books, accounts, papers, records, and documents relating to an investigation; provided, that:

The materials to be produced are relevant to the investigation;

The materials to be produced are specified with reasonable particularity; and

The subpoenas command production of the materials covering only a reasonable period of time;

Have the power to compel the production of employment records during an investigation. For purposes of this subdivision (a)(17)(B), “employment records” includes records of future, past, or present employees who are applying for or have received a form of public assistance or are members of the household of a person who is applying for or has received a form of public assistance from this state or another state;

Have the authority to refer any matter to the appropriate enforcement authority for criminal prosecution;

Have the authority to refer any matter to the appropriate enforcement authorities for civil proceedings, including, but not limited to, referral to the attorney general and reporter for civil recovery;

Have the authority to cooperate with other state agencies to investigate fraud and abuse in programs administered by the department;

Have the authority to furnish information to educate the public about the fraud and abuse laws pertaining to programs administered by the department; and

Have the authority to contract with entities as necessary to carry out the required duties of subdivisions (a)(17)(C)-(F).

Notwithstanding any state law or regulation to the contrary, the department may provide low-income energy assistance at any percentage of the federal income poverty level that is permitted by federal law.

Acts 1937, ch. 48, § 3; 1937, ch. 299, § 1; 1939, ch. 95, §§ 4-6; impl. am. Acts 1943, ch. 154, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.5 (Williams, §§ 371.3, 4765.3); impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; modified; Acts 1972, ch. 624, § 2; 1973, ch. 337, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a), (b); 1975, ch. 279, § 1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 14-105; Acts 1984, ch. 789, § 3; T.C.A., §14-1-105; Acts 1993, ch. 284, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, § 153; 1998, ch. 1098, § 64; 2000, ch. 981, §§ 14, 51; 2010, ch. 626, § 1; 2013, ch. 402, § 1; 2018, ch. 789, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of USDA donated commodity distribution programs administered by the department of human services to the department of agriculture, see Executive Order No. 55 (October 26, 1983).

For transfer of certain powers and duties to the office of children's services administration in the department of finance and administration, see Executive Order No. 58 (June 29, 1994).

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 184 provided:

“Any provision of this act, or the application thereof, which is inconsistent with federal law, rule or regulation shall be deemed to be construed as being consistent with federal law, rule or regulation.”

Cross-References. Council on pensions and insurance, §3-9-101.

Employment Security Law, title 50, ch. 7.

Family violence shelter and child abuse prevention services, title 71, ch. 6, part 2.

Functions in general, §4-3-1203.

Guardianship of the person of a minor, title 34, ch. 1.

Interstate Compact on Adoption and Medical Assistance, title 36, ch. 1, part 2.

Rules and regulations for conduct of subsidized receiving homes for children, §37-2-304.

Services for children with physical disabilities, title 68, ch. 12.

Subsidized receiving homes for children, inspection, §§37-2-305,37-2-317.

Subsidized receiving homes for children, state aid, §37-2-303.

Vocational rehabilitation, title 49, ch. 11, parts 6-8.

Attorney General Opinions. Subject to any regulations or restrictions related to state contracts, the department of human services' services for the blind program may contract with a private vending machine management company to arrange for third party vending and to collect commissions from the operation of vending machines on its behalf, OAG 04-166, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 177 (11/19/04).

If the department of human services elects to contract with third parties for the provision of vending services at unassigned vending facilities on public property, both parties' authority, including the authority to set the prices of products to be vended, would be determined by reference to the relevant contract, OAG 04-166, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 177 (11/19/04).

71-1-106. Appointment of chief officer and personnel.

The chief administrative and executive officer of the department shall be appointed by the governor solely on a basis of merit as measured by education, ability, and experience in the administration of public welfare activities and without regard to residence or political affiliation. Such officer shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. Such officer shall have general charge and supervision of the department and shall appoint the heads of such divisions as may be created. The choice of personnel shall be made on the basis of merit as measured by experience and training in each particular field. Vacancies in superior positions shall be filled so far as practicable by promotion based on meritorious service.

Acts 1937, ch. 48, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.11 (Williams, § 4765.8); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-106, 14-1-106.

Cross-References. Commissioner, appointment, §4-3-112.

71-1-107. Duties of commissioner.

As chief executive officer of the department, the commissioner shall be charged with the supervision and administration of all welfare activities subject to its jurisdiction. The commissioner at all times has the power, which the commissioner may also delegate to officers and employees of the department, of visitation, inspection and administration of local governmental welfare agencies subject to the commissioner's supervision and the books, records and accounts of each institution or agency shall be open to the commissioner's inspection. In the supervision and administration of local welfare activities, the commissioner shall advise with local authorities, and may provide such specialized services as may be necessary to the end that the laws shall be faithfully executed and that the various welfare agencies of the local government shall function effectively in relationship to one another and to the department.

Acts 1937, ch. 48, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.12 (Williams, § 4765.9); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-107, 14-1-107.

Cross-References. Duties of commissioner, §4-3-1204.

Attorney General Opinions. Subject to any regulations or restrictions related to state contracts, the department of human services' services for the blind program may contract with a private vending machine management company to arrange for third party vending and to collect commissions from the operation of vending machines on its behalf, OAG 04-166, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 177 (11/19/04).

If the department of human services elects to contract with third parties for the provision of vending services at unassigned vending facilities on public property, both parties' authority, including the authority to set the prices of products to be vended, would be determined by reference to the relevant contract, OAG 04-166, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 177 (11/19/04).

71-1-108. Authority over personnel.

The commissioner has the power, having regard to the efficient performance of the department's functions, to create positions in the department and in any division, region, agency, institution or service of the department for the accomplishment of the purposes of this part and to abolish these positions and the existing positions of officers and employees who by this part are transferred to the department. The positions in the department shall be classified by the commissioner according to the nature of the duties to be performed and the minimum qualifications for appointment, and such appointments shall be made on a merit basis. The commissioner, having regard to the nature of the services to be performed and the salaries paid for similar work elsewhere, shall establish a salary range for each class of position and within such salary range shall provide by rule for recognition of efficiency of service and length of service. All matters relating to personnel of the department shall be handled in accordance with, and under rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to authority of, title 8, chapter 30, parts 2 and 3.

Acts 1937, ch. 48, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.13 (Williams, § 4765.10); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-108, 14-1-108.

71-1-109. Legal assistance — Property — Rules.

The attorney general and reporter shall, when requested, advise the department on matters of law. The department may acquire, hold, and alienate property necessary or desirable for the performance of the functions vested in it by law. It shall have all powers necessary and proper for the carrying out of its functions, including the power to adopt and promulgate rules binding upon itself, and all persons subject to its control.

Acts 1937, ch. 48, § 6; 1949, ch. 114, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.9 (Williams, § 4765.6); Acts 1979, ch. 422, § 27; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-109, 14-1-109.

71-1-110. Advisory committees — Multi-disciplinary protective services advisory teams.

The commissioner has the authority to appoint, with the consent and approval of the governor, a committee or committees of citizens to act in an advisory capacity on any matter within the jurisdiction of the department, and to reimburse such members for their actual expenses in attending meetings of such committee or committees called at the commissioner's discretion from time to time. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The commissioner shall establish in each service region at least one (1) multi-disciplinary adult protective services evaluation team for review of protective services cases. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1937, ch. 48, § 13; 1949, ch. 113, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.16 (Williams, § 4765.13); Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1 (142); 1977, ch. 482, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-110, 14-1-110; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 154.

71-1-111. Hearings — Evidence.

The commissioner has the power to conduct or cause to be conducted hearings relating to the fact determination that the department is authorized or required to make; provided, that the commissioner, and any officer or employee of the department upon written authorization from the commissioner, has the power to administer oaths and affirmations, take depositions, issue subpoenas, and require the production of any books and records that may be necessary.

Acts 1937, ch. 48, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.15 (Williams, § 4765.12); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-111, 14-1-111.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of The Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339.

71-1-112. Divisions and regions — Division of housing and emergency shelter.

For the efficient and economical performance of the powers and functions vested in the department:

The commissioner may establish within the department such divisions as may be necessary for the effective administration of the department. These divisions shall be charged with such duties and responsibilities as may be delegated to them by the commissioner, and the commissioner shall have the power to allocate and reallocate functions among such divisions. Each division shall be administered by a director who shall be appointed by the commissioner solely on a basis of merit as measured by training, ability and experience;

There shall be established, for the purposes of local administration throughout the state, regions comprised of one (1) or more counties. Each such region shall be administered or supervised by a regional director, who shall be appointed by the commissioner solely on a basis of merit as measured by training, ability, and experience. The regional director, or such employees as the regional director may delegate, shall have the power of visitation and report of all charitable and relief institutions within the region that rightly come under the department as set out in this part, and such other powers as may be delegated by the commissioner. The regional director shall foster cooperation and intelligent coordination of work between all public and private charitable and social agencies in the region to the end that public resources and charitable donations may be efficiently managed and the needs of the region adequately cared for; and

The commissioner has the power to create such subordinate divisions and such departmental agencies within the department as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

There is created within the department a division of housing and emergency shelter. The commissioner shall appoint a director of housing and emergency shelter as provided in this subsection (b). The commissioner shall employ all consultants or staff assigned or performing duties for the division.

The director has the power, duty and responsibility to:

Coordinate consultant or staff assignments and administrative functions and activities of the division;

Assign personnel to staff the various offices designated to carry out the purposes of this subsection (b) that assures the most efficient use of personnel; and

Coordinate the efforts of the division of housing and emergency shelter with all other individuals, agencies and organizations providing similar or equivalent services.

The division shall cooperate and integrate its services with local agencies, local homeless coalitions, local and state housing authorities, and other local and state agencies, and shall engage in such activities as well as promote a high level of communication among the many individuals, entities and organizations concerned with homelessness issues. The division shall actively participate, subject to funds specifically appropriated in the general appropriations act, in the weatherization, rehabilitation and renovation of housing that qualifies for appropriate programs as determined by the division. The division shall work directly with the departments of mental health and substance abuse services and intellectual and developmental disabilities to ensure that adequate and appropriate institutional and community-based services and shelter are provided to persons in need of them.

The division shall develop and implement a plan for providing rental units on a sliding fee scale. In so doing, emphasis shall be given to locating rental units at a cost to the individual of less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per month. The division shall also develop and implement a plan for providing emergency shelter for individuals who are unable to pay rent. In carrying out its duties and responsibilities, the division shall maximize all federal and private funds and grants and block funding, as well as create a mechanism for providing rental and other deposits and subsidy payments for eligible individuals. The division shall actively be involved in new programs designed to relieve the housing shortage for eligible individuals as determined by the division and shall initiate and implement any such programs as they become available and feasible.

The offices of the division shall be located in areas that are easily accessible to those who require the services of the division. Office space for such offices may be located in conjunction with any present agency of state government or an appropriate agency of local government that serves the population sought to be served by this subsection (b). Personnel from such agencies may be utilized by the division where appropriate. Such offices shall also serve as a coordinating center to provide information and referral services for crisis intervention, counseling, case management, job placement services, day shelter, transportation services and access to other agencies that serve the population in which such individuals are included.

The division is authorized to promulgate necessary and appropriate rules and regulations to implement the effect and intent of this subsection (b). Such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The funding for the division, created by this subsection (b), shall be subject to funds specifically appropriated for such purpose in the general appropriations act.

Acts 1937, ch. 48, § 11; 1939, ch. 95, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.14 (Williams, § 4765.11); Acts 1955, ch. 25, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-112, 14-1-112; Acts 1990, ch. 1070, §§ 1-7; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2010, ch. 1100, § 131; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Rules for local agencies, §4-3-1204.

71-1-113. Expenditure of funds.

The department shall administer and expend funds appropriated to it by the general assembly or available from allotments by the federal government to the state or from contributions from the counties, cities, or other local units of government, or from other sources, in carrying out the duties imposed upon it by §71-1-105, including the special training of personnel required to carry out such duties, and including grants to public or other nonprofit institutions of higher learning for training personnel employed or preparing for employment in a public welfare program, and for such other purposes as may be specified by law or delegated to it by the governor, including the publication of reports and the dissemination of information as to the cause and treatment of social ill-being and the prevention of maladjustment and delinquency.

Acts 1937, ch. 48, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.6 (Williams, § 4765.4); Acts 1953, ch. 10, § 1; 1957, ch. 99, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-113, 14-1-113.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of certain powers and duties to the office of children's services administration in the department of finance and administration, see Executive Order No. 58 (June 29, 1994).

71-1-114. Compliance with federal requirements authorized.

In the event that the federal government increases the percentages of funds to be furnished by it that may be matched by the state and used in connection with chapters 2-4 of this title, providing assistance to aged persons, aid to dependent children, or any successor program, and aid to the needy blind, the department is authorized to conform to the provisions of federal acts relating to the matching of administrative expense in a higher ratio than provided in such acts and to conform to the provisions for a higher ratio of matching of funds for assistance purposes. The department is further authorized to use any funds granted by the federal government in connection with such programs for the purpose for which they are granted and subject to the limitations or conditions contained in such grants.

Acts 1937, ch. 48, § 4(b), as added by Acts 1941, ch. 40, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.7 (Williams, § 4765.4); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-114, 14-1-114; Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 22.

71-1-115. Conditions imposed on local governments.

Whenever the department has discretion to expend funds appropriated for the purposes either through the officers and employees of the department or in the form of grants-in-aid to local governmental authorities, it shall decide with reference to the use of grants-in-aid according to the availability and adequacy of the facilities under the control of the local governmental authorities, as compared with the facilities of the department for furnishing the services required to be rendered; such funds shall be made available according to uniform rules to all local authorities performing similar functions. In formulating such rules, the department has the power to:

Fix minimum standards of service and efficiency to be required of the local governmental authorities in carrying out the functions reposed in them by law;

Provide for the termination of any grant-in-aid to any such authority whenever the department shall find that such minimum standards are not being complied with; and

Require that as a condition of receiving grants-in-aid the local units of government shall bear specific proportions of the total expense of performing the designated functions.

Acts 1937, ch. 48, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.10 (Williams, § 4765.7); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-115, 14-1-115.

71-1-116. Judicial enforcement of subpoena — Notice — Inspection of employment records and credit bureau reports.

If a person, firm, or corporation subpoenaed pursuant to authority granted pursuant to § 71-1-105(a)(17)(A) fails to comply with the subpoena, after reasonable notice to the person, firm, or corporation, the department may seek judicial enforcement of the subpoena by filing, through the attorney general and reporter, a petition with the circuit or chancery court of Davidson County or of the judicial district in which such person, firm, or corporation resides.

A petition filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) must incorporate or be accompanied by a certification regarding the notice given and the failure of such person, firm, or corporation to attend or produce the items requested.

Upon the filing of a petition pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) in the proper form, the court shall order the person, firm, or corporation named in the petition to appear and show cause why the person, firm, or corporation should not be required to comply with the subpoena or be held in contempt for failure to comply. The court may employ all judicial power provided by law to compel compliance with a subpoena requested pursuant to subdivision (a)(1), including the powers granted in §§ 29-9-103 — 29-9-106. The court is authorized to impose costs and sanctions against any person, firm, or corporation against whom a petition is filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) in the same manner and on the same bases as may be imposed for failure to comply with judicially issued subpoenas under the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure. The court may order the person, firm, or corporation to comply with the subpoena and may punish each day of noncompliance with the order as a separate contempt of court.

The subpoena enforcement remedies set forth in subdivision (a)(3) are cumulative and not exclusive of any other remedies provided by law.

Employment records, as defined in § 71-1-105(a)(17)(B), shall be open to inspection and copying by a department representative at any reasonable time and as often as may be necessary.

The department shall also have the right to compare information reported to the department by applicants or recipients with data maintained by the credit bureaus.

Acts 2018, ch. 789, § 2.

71-1-117. Public inspection of welfare lists.

The commissioner is authorized and instructed to make public to any citizen of Tennessee through the office of the commissioner or county human services offices the names of all recipients of public welfare grants and the amount of each grant per month, each list to be broken down by counties. Only the list containing the recipients resident in a particular county is to be available for inspection in that county. The lists of all counties are to be available for inspection in the office of the commissioner.

Acts 1953, ch. 29, § 1 (Williams, § 4765.13a); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, §§ 1 (a, b), 2 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-117, 14-1-117.

Cross-References. Improper disclosure of information pertaining to recipients, §§71-2-214,71-3-119,71-4-115.

71-1-118. Restrictions on use of welfare list.

The welfare lists referred to in § 71-1-117 cannot be used for political or commercial purposes and no one will be permitted to copy such a list.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1953, ch. 29, § 2 (Williams, § 4765.13a); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-118, 14-1-118; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

71-1-119. Utilization of senior citizens' services.

The department may establish a program utilizing senior citizens as volunteers and, to the extent funds are available, as employees in programs that provide services for children, persons with disabilities and other senior citizens. The department may utilize such federal funds as are available for these purposes.

Acts 1974, ch. 706, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 14-119, 14-1-119; Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 96.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

71-1-120. Federal funds — Administrative economy.

This section shall be construed, insofar as is practicable, so as to be consistent with Title XX of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. §§ 1397 et seq.), and regulations issued under the authority of that act. The commissioner shall take reasonable steps to assure that the cost of administering, monitoring, and overseeing services performed by public providers and private providers shall be accomplished as economically as practicable. In the event that such expenditures are estimated to exceed six percent (6%) of the total estimated expenditures for services provided by public providers and private providers, the commissioner shall include in the annual service plan a statement to that effect, accompanied with an explanation of the reasons why such expenditures cannot be held to or below six percent (6%) of the estimated cost of services provided by public and private providers.

Acts 1976, ch. 687, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 14-120, 14-1-120.

71-1-121. Access to public assistance records by authorized counsel.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the department shall grant access to all public assistance records, reports, documents, case files or other similar documents about a person who has applied for or is receiving or has received public assistance, including, but not limited to, temporary assistance for needy families (TANF), or any successor program, food assistance pursuant to chapter 5, part 3 of this title, medicaid and Title XX services (42 U.S.C. §§ 1397 et seq.), to authorized counsel for the person.

Acts 1981, ch. 355, § 1; T.C.A., §14-1-121; Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 23.

Code Commission Notes.

Former references to “aid to families with dependent children (AFDC)” were deleted as obsolete by the code commission and were changed to “temporary assistance for needy families (TANF)” in 2004.

71-1-122. Review of human services advisory committees.

The human services advisory committees appointed by the commissioner shall periodically be subject to review pursuant to the governmental entity review law, compiled in title 4, chapter 29, simultaneously with, and as an adjunct to, the department.

Acts 1985, ch. 127, § 3; T.C.A., §14-1-122.

Cross-References. Governmental entity review law, title 4, ch. 29.